Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 7
HOUSING AND BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT AND FINANCING

29-4-701. Short title.

This part 7 shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Housing and Finance Authority Act".

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 970, § 1, effective April 19.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 1190, § 1, effective May 20.

Editor's note:

This section was enacted as § 29-4-700.1 in House Bill 75-1026 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-702. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that there is a shortage in Colorado of decent, safe, and sanitary housing which is within the financial capabilities of low- and moderate-income families. In order to alleviate the high cost of construction loans and home mortgage interest costs for such families, the general assembly believes that it is essential that additional public moneys be made available, through the issuance of revenue bonds, to assist both private enterprise and governmental entities in meeting critical housing needs. The general assembly also finds and declares that the compelling need within the state for such assistance can best be met by the establishment of a quasi-governmental and corporate entity vested with the powers and duties specified in this part 7.

The general assembly further finds and declares that many housing facilities occupied by low- and moderate-income families use excessive and unnecessary amounts of energy for heating and other home uses due to inadequate insulation or to the absence of other design features or materials which reduce total home energy requirements; that high costs impair the ability of such families to afford decent, safe, and sanitary housing facilities; that many such facilities do not conform to building, housing maintenance, fire, health, or other state, county, or municipal codes or standards applicable to housing; that many such facilities are located in, and by their condition contribute to, deteriorating neighborhoods; that many such facilities are inadequate for the number of persons occupying them; that many such facilities cannot be repaired or improved within the financial capabilities of the low- or moderate-income owners or occupants; and that existing private and public means of enterprise and investment cannot provide financing or assistance on terms and conditions within the means of many such low- or moderate-income families. These conditions are adverse to the safety, health, and welfare of the citizens of this state and are contrary to the public policies of promoting the conservation of scarce energy resources, of minimizing the impact of higher costs on the ability of low- and moderate-income families to afford decent, safe, and sanitary housing facilities, and of preventing and eliminating blight in urban and rural areas. The general assembly therefore further finds and declares that it is a valid public purpose to preserve and promote the safety, health, and welfare of the citizens of this state by the exercise of the powers specified in this part 7.

The general assembly further finds and declares that there exists in this state a need to promote sound economic development, to maintain employment, and to encourage job opportunities in areas of unemployment and underemployment by assisting in the provision of facilities for business enterprises, including profit and nonprofit enterprises and particularly enterprises of small and moderate size, by assisting in the provision of capital to such business enterprises, and by otherwise supporting such business enterprises. The general assembly therefore finds and declares that it is a valid public purpose to preserve and promote the safety, health, and welfare of this state and its inhabitants by the exercise of the powers specified in this part 7 to finance the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement, and equipping of facilities for business enterprises, including profit and nonprofit enterprises and particularly enterprises of small and moderate size, by private persons and political subdivisions of this state, to finance loans to and to make equity investments in such business enterprises for capital purposes, and to otherwise support such business enterprises.

The general assembly further finds and declares that the purpose of this part 7 is to create the Colorado strategic seed fund to meet the special needs of entrepreneurs and small business operators in Colorado who would not otherwise be able to obtain funding for the development of ideas into viable and marketable products and services which would enhance the economic growth and development of Colorado, that this fund will be used to establish operating seed funds for investment in small businesses, and that this investment will, in turn, lead to further growth, diversification, and improvement of the Colorado economy.

The general assembly further finds and declares:

That there exists a need to leverage private sector investment in new and innovative products, in entrepreneurial activity, and in economic development finance and that, therefore, state assistance for development finance should reflect a leveraging investment strategy; and

That the lending and investment of moneys to develop and improve the economy of the state requires specialized and unique knowledge, skill, and experience.

The general assembly further finds and declares that the investment strategy of the managers of the operating seed funds should be:

To invest in companies in the earliest stages of their development;

To invest in companies which have exceptional merit and which will be located within the state of Colorado;

To invest in companies in which the founding entrepreneurs have made significant individual investments;

To invest in companies whose success will result in the creation of jobs in Colorado;

To invest in companies which will attract other sources of venture capital for long-term development;

To invest in attractive growth companies which are coupled with the state's business incubators;

To assist companies with direct and ongoing business consultation to establish a viable management structure and strategic plan;

To provide an opportunity for subsequent financing for follow-up operations of successful companies;

To limit the amount invested by a manager in investments outside of Colorado to not more than fifty percent of the capital of an operating seed fund.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 805, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-11-1.

L. 76:

Entire section amended, p. 688, § 1, effective April 19.

L. 77:

(2) amended, p. 1412, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 82:

(3) added, p. 461, § 1, effective April 23.

L. 87:

(3) amended, p. 1190, § 2, effective May 20.

L. 88:

(4) to (6) added, p. 1101, § 1, effective May 29.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 29-4-701 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-703. Definitions - rules.

As used in this part 7, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Authority" means the Colorado housing and finance authority created by this part 7.

"Board" means the board of directors of the Colorado housing and finance authority.

"Bond" means any bond, note, or other obligation of the Colorado housing and finance authority authorized to be issued under this part 7.

(3.1) "Capital" means funds that are provided for the research, development, refinement, or commercialization of a product or process, and funds that are provided for the operation of a business enterprise, including but not limited to the cost of personnel, rent, administrative services, utilities, insurance, equipment, raw materials, work in progress and stock in trade, or debt service on the financing thereof, or such other corporate purposes as may be approved by the board. "Capital" shall not include the cost of facilities that are financed by the authority as a project pursuant to this part 7.

(3.5) "County" means any county within this state.

"Executive director" means the executive director of the Colorado housing and finance authority appointed by the board of directors of said authority.

(4.5) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 703, § 1, effective May 3, 2007.)

"Family" means two or more persons, whether or not related by blood, marriage, or adoption, who live or expect to live together as a single household in the same home, a single person who is either at least sixty-two years of age or has a disability, or such other single persons as the board may by rule determine to be eligible for assistance under this part 7.

(5.1) "Federal government" means the United States and any agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States.

(5.2) "Financing agreement" includes a lease, sublease, installment purchase agreement, rental agreement, option to purchase, loan agreement, participation agreement, loan purchase agreement, or any other agreement, or any combination thereof, entered into in connection with the financing of a project or housing facility or the provision of capital pursuant to this part 7.

(5.3) "Governing body" means the board, council, officer, or group charged with exercising the legislative power of a government.

(5.4) "Government" means the federal government, the state government, and any county, municipality, or state agency.

(5.5) "Home improvement loan" means a loan of money for the alteration, repair, or improvement of an existing housing facility. The term does not include a loan for a pool, hot tub, or any other construction not directly improving the structural integrity, general appearance, or living conditions within the housing facility.

"Housing facility" means any work or undertaking that is designed and financed pursuant to this part 7 for the primary purpose of providing decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling accommodations. Such dwelling accommodations may provide for separate, shared, or congregate facilities. "Housing facility" may include any buildings, land, equipment, facilities, or other real or personal property:

Found necessary by the authority to insure required occupancy or balanced community development; or

Found necessary or desirable by the authority for sound economic or commercial development of a community.

"Housing facility loan" means a loan of money, including advances and temporary and permanent loans, for the construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, or purchase of a housing facility.

"Lender" means any state bank chartered by the state of Colorado or any national banking association located in Colorado, state or federal savings and loan association located in Colorado, FHA-approved mortgagee, insurance company, mortgage banking or other financial institution, or public or private entity providing economic development assistance approved by the board.

"Loan to lender" means a loan of money to a lender.

"Low-income family" and "low- or moderate-income family" mean a family whose income is insufficient to secure decent, safe, and sanitary housing provided by private industry without loans or other incentives made by the authority or federal subsidies and whose income is below respective income limits established by the board by rule, taking into consideration such factors as the following:

The amount of the total income of such family available for housing needs;

The size of the family;

The cost and condition of housing facilities available;

The ability of such family to compete successfully in the private housing market and to pay the amounts at which private enterprise is providing decent, safe, and sanitary housing; and

Standards established by various programs of the federal government for determining eligibility based on income of such family.

"Mortgage" means a mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument constituting a first lien on real property in this state and improvements constructed or to be constructed thereon or on a leasehold under a lease having a remaining term, at the time such mortgage is acquired, of not less than the term for repayment of the obligation secured by such mortgage.

"Mortgage loan" means a loan of money, including advances and temporary loans, for the construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, purchase, or refinancing of a housing facility, which loan is evidenced by an obligation secured by a mortgage.

(12.1) "Municipality" means any city, including without limitation any city or city and county operating under a home rule or special legislative charter, or town within this state.

(12.4) "Project" means a work or improvement that is or will be located in this state, including but not limited to real property, buildings, equipment, furnishings, and any other real and personal property or any interest therein, financed, refinanced, acquired, owned, constructed, reconstructed, extended, rehabilitated, improved, or equipped, directly or indirectly, in whole or in part, by the authority and that is designed and intended for the purpose of providing facilities for manufacturing, warehousing, commercial, recreational, hotel, office, research and development, or other business or economic purposes, including but not limited to machinery and equipment deemed necessary for the operation thereof, excluding raw material, work in process, or stock in trade. "Project" includes more than one project or any portion of a project, but shall not include a housing facility or any portion thereof unless the authority elects to treat such housing facility or portion thereof as a project. "Project" shall not include the financing by the authority of any county or municipal public facilities beyond the boundaries of the project, except to the extent that such facilities are adjacent to the project and support the operation of the project.

(12.5) "Project costs" means the sum total of all costs incurred in the development of a project which are approved by the authority as reasonable and necessary. "Project costs" includes, but is not limited to:

The cost of acquiring real property and any buildings thereon, including but not limited to payments for options, deposits, or contracts to purchase properties;

The cost of site preparation, demolition, and development;

Any expenses relating to the issuance of bonds or notes;

Fees in connection with the planning, execution, and financing of the project, such as those of architects, engineers, attorneys, accountants, and the authority;

The cost of studies, surveys, plans and permits, insurance, interest, financing, tax and assessment costs, and other operating and carrying costs incurred during construction;

The cost of construction, rehabilitation, reconstruction, and equipping of the project, not including the cost of raw materials, work in process, and stock in trade;

The cost of land improvements, such as landscaping and off-site improvements;

Expenses in connection with initial occupancy of the project;

A reasonable profit and risk fee in addition to job overhead to the general contractor and, if applicable, the sponsor;

An allowance established by the authority for contingency reserves and reserves for any anticipated operating deficits after completion of the project; and

The cost of other items that the authority determines to be reasonable and necessary for the development of the project, including but not limited to relocation costs, utility connection fees, indemnity and surety bonds, premiums on insurance, and fees and expenses of trustees, depositories, and paying agents for the bonds and notes.

(12.6) "Project plan" means the plan for a project or projects and includes but is not limited to:

A map or any other appropriate representation of the area and the location of the project;

A statement of proposed land uses;

Any proposed amendments to, changes in, or variances from the master plan, official map, or zoning regulations or other land use regulations, codes, or ordinances of the county or municipality in which the project is to be located;

A proposal for the acquisition of real property;

A proposal for the demolition and removal of existing structures;

A description of the project;

A statement of the plan's relationship to any officially adopted objectives of the county or municipality as to land uses, density of population, traffic, public transportation, public utilities, recreational and community facilities, other public improvements, and the protection of the environment;

A statement of the provision being made for the temporary and permanent relocation of any persons who may be displaced by the construction of the project;

A proposed time schedule for the effectuation of the plan; and

Additional statements or documentation as the authority may deem appropriate.

(12.8) "Real property" means all lands and franchises and interests in land located within this state, including lands under water and riparian rights, space rights and air rights, and any and all other things usually included within said term. "Real property" includes any and all interests in such property less than full title, such as easements, incorporeal hereditaments, and every estate, interest, or right, legal or equitable.

(12.9) "Small business" means a profit or nonprofit enterprise of small or moderate size, as determined by the board pursuant to regulation taking into consideration such factors as the following:

The net assets of the enterprise;

The number of employees involved or to be involved in the normal operation of the project;

The total number of employees involved or to be involved in the normal operation of the enterprise as a whole;

The type, size, and cost of the project; and

Applicable standards and criteria periodically applied by the federal government in administering assistance programs for enterprises of small or moderate size.

"Sponsor" means an individual, joint venture, partnership, limited partnership, trust, corporation, cooperative, condominium, association, public body, including the authority, or any other legal entity or combination thereof, which:

The authority has approved as qualified to own, construct, acquire, rehabilitate, operate, lease, manage, or maintain part or all of a housing facility or a project; and

Except for a county, municipality, or other public body, has agreed to subject itself to the regulatory powers of the authority.

Repealed.

"State agency" means any board, authority, agency, department, commission, public corporation, body politic, or instrumentality of this state other than a municipality or a county.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 805, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-11-2.

L. 75:

(6) amended and (6.5), (7.5), (9), (10), and (11) added, p. 970, § 2, effective April 19.

L. 76:

(11) amended and (12) added, p. 689, § 2, effective April 19.

L. 77:

(5), (6), (8), and (9) amended, p. 1416, § 1, effective May 14; (5.5) added, (11) amended, and (12) repealed, pp. 1413, 1415, §§ 2, 6, effective June 19.

L. 82:

(6) R&RE, p. 471, § 1, effective April 15; (8) amended, (13) R&RE, and (3.5), (5.1), (5.2), (5.3), (5.4), (12.1), (12.4), (12.5), (12.6) (12.8), (12.9), (15), and (16) added, pp. 461, 462, § 2, 3, 4, effective April 23.

L. 84:

(4.5) added, p. 807, § 1, effective April 13.

L. 85:

IP(6) amended, p. 1040, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) to (3), (4), (5.2), (8), (12.4), and IP(13) amended, (3.1) added, and (16) repealed, pp. 1191, 1197, §§ 3, 21, effective May 20.

L. 93:

(5) amended, p. 1669, § 84, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(3), (4.5), (5), (5.2), (5.5), (6), IP(10), (12), and (12.4) amended, p. 703, § 1, effective May 3.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 29-4-702 in C.R.S. 1973, but this section and the subsections within this section were renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location. The definition of "thermal performance improvement loan", added as subsection (12) in 1976 and subsequently repealed in 1977, was renumbered as subsection (14) in the 1977 replacement volume.

29-4-704. Colorado housing and finance authority.

There is hereby created the Colorado housing and finance authority, which shall be a body corporate and a political subdivision of the state, shall not be an agency of state government, and shall not be subject to administrative direction by any department, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the state.

The powers of the authority shall be vested in the governing body of the authority, which shall be a board of directors consisting of:

The state auditor;

A member of the general assembly appointed jointly by the speaker of the house and the majority leader of the senate to serve for the legislative biennium. The legislative member shall be appointed in January at the beginning of the regular session held in odd-numbered years.

Eight persons, who shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, as follows:

One member who shall be experienced in mortgage banking;

One member who shall be experienced in real estate transactions;

Six additional members to be appointed without regard to their occupations; except that, in making such appointments, the governor shall give strong consideration to the appointment of a member trained in architecture and a member trained in city or regional planning;

An executive director of a principal department of the state government appointed by the governor who shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.

Each member appointed by the governor shall be appointed for a term of four years; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than three members' terms expire in the same year.

Each member shall hold office for the member's term and until a successor is appointed. Any member is eligible for reappointment, but members are not eligible to serve more than two consecutive full terms. Members of the board serve without compensation for such services but are entitled to be reimbursed for their necessary expenses while serving as a member of the board. Any vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments for the unexpired term.

Any appointed member of the board may be removed by the governor, and the legislative representative by the speaker of the house and the majority leader of the senate, for malfeasance in office, failure to regularly attend meetings, or for any cause which renders said member incapable of or unfit to discharge the duties of his office.

No part of the revenues or assets of the authority shall inure to the benefit of, or be distributed to, its members or officers or any other private persons or entities.

The authority and its corporate existence shall continue until terminated by law; except that no such law shall take effect so long as the authority has bonds, notes, or other obligations outstanding, unless adequate provision has been made for the payment thereof. Upon termination of the existence of the authority, all its rights and properties in excess of its obligations shall pass to and be vested in the state.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 806, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-11-3.

L. 75:

Entire section R&RE, p. 971, § 3, effective April 9.

L. 77:

(6) and (7) added, p. 1417, § 2, effective May 14.

L. 87:

(1) amended, (2)(c) R&RE, and (2)(d) and (3)(c) added, p. 1192, §§ 4, 5, 6, 7, effective May 20; IP(3)(a) and (3)(b) amended and (3)(d) added, p. 912, § 25, effective June 15; (3)(c) amended, p. 1589, § 67, effective July 10.

L. 2022:

(3) and (4) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 72, § 96, effective February 25.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 29-4-703 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

Cross references:

For the provisions that designate the Colorado housing and finance authority as a "special purpose authority" for the purposes of section 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution, see § 24-77-102 (15); for limitation on issuance of private activity bonds, see part 17 of article 32 of title 24.

29-4-704.5. Reference in contracts and documents.

Whenever the Colorado housing finance authority is referred to or designated by any contract or document in connection with the duties and functions set forth in this part 7, such reference or designation shall be deemed to apply to the Colorado housing and finance authority.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 1192, § 8, effective May 20.

29-4-705. Records of board.

All resolutions and orders shall be recorded and authenticated by the signature of the secretary or any assistant secretary of the board. Every legislative act of the board of a general or permanent nature shall be by resolution. The book of resolutions, corporate acts, and orders shall be a public record. A public record shall also be made of all other proceedings of the board, minutes of the meetings, annual reports, certificates, contracts, and bonds given by officers, employees, and any other agents of the authority. The account of all moneys received by and disbursed on behalf of the authority shall also be a public record. All public records of the authority shall be subject to the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S. All records shall be subject to the uniform budget and audit laws and shall be subject to regular audit as provided therein.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 807, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-11-4.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1417, § 3, effective May 14.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 705, § 2, effective May 3.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1977, § 105, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 29-4-704 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

Cross references:

For the uniform budget and audit laws, see parts 1 and 6 of article 1 of this title.

29-4-706. Meetings of board.

All meetings of the board shall be open to the public. No business of the board shall be transacted except at a regular or special meeting at which a quorum consisting of at least a majority of the total membership of the board is present. Any action of the board shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of the members present at such meeting.

One or more members of the board may participate in any meeting and may vote through the use of telecommunications devices, including, but not limited to, a conference telephone or similar communications equipment. Such participation through telecommunications devices shall constitute presence in person at such meeting. Such use of telecommunications shall not supersede any requirements for public hearing otherwise provided by law.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 807, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-11-5.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 705, § 3, effective May 3.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 29-4-705 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-707. Disclosure of interests required.

Any board member, employee, or other agent or adviser of the authority, who has a direct or indirect interest in any contract or transaction with the authority, shall disclose this interest to the authority. This interest shall be set forth in the minutes of the authority, and no board member, employee, or other agent or adviser having such interest shall participate on behalf of the authority in the authorization of any such contract or transaction.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 807, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-11-6.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 29-4-706 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-708. General powers of the authority - repeal.

In addition to any other powers granted to the authority in this part 7, the authority has the following powers:

To have the duties, privileges, immunities, rights, liabilities, and disabilities of a body corporate and political subdivision of the state;

To have perpetual existence and succession;

To adopt, have, and use a seal and to alter the same at its pleasure;

To sue and be sued;

To enter into any contract or agreement not inconsistent with this part 7 or the laws of this state;

To borrow money and to issue bonds evidencing the same;

To purchase, lease, trade, exchange, or otherwise acquire, maintain, hold, improve, mortgage, lease, and dispose of real property and personal property, whether tangible or intangible, and any interest therein;

To acquire office space, equipment, services, supplies, and insurance necessary to carry out the purposes of this part 7;

To deposit any moneys of the authority in any banking institution within or without the state or in any depository authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S., and to appoint, for the purpose of making such deposits, one or more persons to act as custodians of the moneys of the authority, who shall give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the board requires;

To disburse any moneys in the revolving fund established pursuant to section 29-4-728 in accordance therewith;

To contract for and to accept any gifts, grants, and loans of funds, property, or any other aid in any form from the federal government, the state, any state agency, or any other source, or any combination thereof, and to comply, subject to the provisions of this part 7, with the terms and conditions thereof;

To act as agent for federal, state, or local government or for qualified organizations or corporations in connection with the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, leasing, operation, or management of a housing facility or project or any part thereof or the furnishing of capital to business enterprises;

To authorize the executive director to enter into contracts, execute all instruments, and do all things necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers granted in this part 7 and to secure the payment of bonds;

To have and exercise all rights and powers necessary or incidental to or implied from the specific powers granted in this part 7, which specific powers shall not be considered as a limitation upon any power necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and intent of this part 7;

To fix the time and place or places at which its regular and special meetings are to be held. Meetings shall be held on the call of the chairman, but no less than eight meetings shall be held annually.

To adopt and from time to time amend or repeal bylaws and rules and regulations consistent with the provisions of this part 7;

To elect one director as chairman of the board and another director as chairman pro tem of the board and to appoint one or more persons as secretary and treasurer of the board and such other officers as the board may determine and provide for their duties and terms of office;

To appoint an executive director and such other agents, employees, and professional and business advisers as may from time to time be necessary in its judgment to accomplish the purposes of this part 7, and to fix the compensation of such employees, agents, and advisers, and to establish the powers and duties of all such officers, agents, and employees and other persons contracting with the authority;

To provide a method for sponsors to let contracts on a fair and equitable basis for the construction of housing facilities or projects or the performance or furnishing of labor, materials, or supplies as required in this part 7;

To the extent permitted under its contract with the holders of bonds, to enter into contracts containing provisions permitting the reduction of the rental or carrying charges to persons unable to pay the regular schedule of charges where, by reason of other income or payment by any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States or this state, such reduction can be made without jeopardizing the economic stability of the housing facility being financed;

To protect the interest of the authority in housing facilities, projects, and loans to and equity investments in business enterprises for capital made under this part 7 by such action as is in the best interests of the authority, including, without limitation, taking assignment of leases, rentals, and other revenues and assets and proceeding with foreclosure, repossession, purchase, sale, or other means of acquisition of such facilities or projects or other security and, in the case of equity investments, taking any action permitted by law or pursuant to any subscription, partnership, or other instrument, certificate, or document related to such investment;

To act as a coinsurer with any department or agency of the federal government with respect to a loan to finance housing facilities for low- or moderate-income families;

To waive, by such means as the authority deems appropriate, the exemption from federal income taxation of interest on the authority's bonds, notes, or other obligations provided by the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, or any other federal statute providing a similar exemption;

To make and execute agreements, contracts, and other instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions of the authority under this part 7, including but not limited to contracts with any person, firm, corporation, municipality, state agency, county, or other entity. All municipalities, counties, and state agencies are hereby authorized to enter into and do all things necessary to perform any such arrangement or contract with the authority.

To arrange for guaranties or insurance of its bonds, notes, or other obligations by the federal government or by any private insurer, and to pay any premiums therefor;

To enter into agreements to pay annual sums in lieu of taxes to any county, municipality, or other taxing entity with respect to any real property which is owned by the authority and is located in such county, municipality, or other taxing entity;

To provide financial advice and counseling with respect to business enterprises and to provide for guaranties, insurance, coinsurance, or reinsurance against risks of loss on loans to business enterprises to finance projects or provide capital.

(I) To contract with the Colorado economic development commission created in section 24-46-102 (1) for the operation of the small business COVID-19 grant program established in section 24-48.5-126 (3).

(II) This subsection (1)(bb) is repealed, effective September 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 807, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-11-7.

L. 75:

IP(1) and (1)(j), (1)(l), (1)(p), (1)(q), and (1)(s) amended and (1)(f) and (1)(u) added, p. 972, § 4, effective April 9.

L. 77:

(1)(v) and (1)(w) added, p. 1417, § 4, May 14.

L. 79:

(1)(j) amended, p. 1618, § 17, effective June 8.

L. 82:

(1)(j) amended and (1)(w) R&RE, pp. 71, 472, § 2, 3, effective April 15; (1)(g), (1)(l), (1)(s), and (1)(u) amended and (1)(k) R&RE, p. 465, § 5, 6, effective April 23.

L. 84:

(1)(aa) added, p. 807, § 2, effective April 13.

L. 87:

(1)(l), (1)(u), (1)(w), and (1)(aa) amended, p. 1193, § 9, effective May 20.

L. 2007:

(1)(aa) amended, p. 705, § 4, effective May 3.

L. 2020:

IP(1) amended and (1)(bb) added, (SB 20-222), ch. 120, p. 497, § 1, effective June 23.

L. 2021:

(1)(bb)(II) amended, (HB 21-1302), ch. 271, p. 1571, § 3, effective June 21.

L. 2022:

(1)(bb)(I) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 93, § 129, effective February 25.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 29-4-707 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.

29-4-709. Power of board - housing facility plans.

The board shall establish criteria for the financial feasibility of any plan for the development of housing facilities to be undertaken with the proceeds of housing facility loans.

If the authority determines that such plan meets the board's criteria, that private financing is not available on reasonably equivalent terms and conditions, and that the necessary means of financing such plan are available to the authority, the authority may accept such plan.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 809, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 69-11-8.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 973, § 5, effective April 9.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 705, § 5, effective May 3.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 29-4-708 in C.R.S. 1973 but was renumbered on revision in the 1977 replacement volume for ease of location.